src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjectives
!  ----------
!! Adjectives in the Lithuanian language describe things.

LEXICON Adjectives
!adjective    Comparisons   ;
sunk Adj_C2 ;
ger Adj_C1 ;
blog Adj_C1 ;
malon Adj_C2 ;
did Adj_C3 ;
juod Adj_C1 ;
balt Adj_C1 ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
